src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON TJUETIE
!tjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:tjuetie FINAL1 ;
tjuetie:tjuet NUMTAGie ;
tjuetie:tjuetie# LUHKIEF ;
tjuetie:tjuetie# LUHKIE- ;
tjuetie:tjuetie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
tjuetie:tjuetie# AKTEF ;
tjuetie:tjuetie# 2TO9F ;
tjuatede+A+Ord:tjuatad ORDTAGODD ;
!akte#tjuetie+Num+Sg+Nom:akte#tjuetie FINAL1 ;
aktetjuetie:akte#tjuet NUMTAGie ;
aktetjuetie:akte#tjuetie# LUHKIEF ;
aktetjuetie:akte#tjuetie# LUHKIE- ;
aktetjuetie:akte#tjuetie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
aktetjuetie:akte#tjuetie# AKTEF ;
aktetjuetie:akte#tjuetie# 2TO9F ;
nïmme:nïmm NUMTAGe_NOTakte ;
nïmme:nïmme# LUHKIEF ;
nïmme:nïmme# LUHKIE- ;
nïmme:nïmme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nïmme:nïmme# AKTEF ;
nïmme:nïmme# 2TO9F ;
nymme:nymm NUMTAGe_NOTakte ;
nymme:nymme# LUHKIEF ;
nymme:nymme# LUHKIE- ;
nymme:nymme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nymme:nymme# AKTEF ;
nymme:nymme# 2TO9F ;
nomme:nomm NUMTAGe_NOTakte ;
nomme:nomme# LUHKIEF ;
nomme:nomme# LUHKIE- ;
nomme:nomme# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
nomme:nomme# AKTEF ;
nomme:nomme# 2TO9F ;
!stoere#luhkie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoere#luhkie FINAL1 ;
stoereluhkie:stoere#luhk NUMTAGie ;
stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie# LUHKIEF ;
stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie# LUHKIE- ;
stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie# AKTEF ;
stoereluhkie:stoere#luhkie# 2TO9F ;
!stoerreluhkie+Num+Sg+Nom:stoerre#luhkie FINAL1 ;
stoerreluhkie:stoerre#luhk NUMTAGie ;
stoerreluhkie:stoerre#luhkie# LUHKIEF ;
stoerreluhkie:stoerre#luhkie# LUHKIE- ;
stoerreluhkie:stoerre#luhkie# 2TO9LUHKIE ;
stoerreluhkie:stoerre#luhkie# AKTEF ;
stoerreluhkie:stoerre#luhkie# 2TO9F ;

luhkietjihtje:luhkietjihtje Num-TODO ;
tjïjhtje-gaektsie:tjïjhtje-gaektsie Num-TODO ;



LEXICON ARABICCOMPOUNDS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ! arabic as first part, 
! :∑-  NAMAT ;            ! 10-jienat, etc. NAMAT derivs are
                    ! treated as compounds and excluded from the nonrec
                    ! variants, otherwise the PLX lexicon size explodes
!+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:-»»# SASCont ; !6-jahkásaš
 RHyph ; ! 3-
  

!LEXICON NUMERALCOMPOUNDS !!≈ * __@CODE@__: numeral as first part: duhatjienat,
!                         !!  logigielat, etc.
!!         NAMAT ; ! duhatjienat, logigielat, etc. NAMAT derivs are
!                 ! treated as compounds and excluded from the nonrec
!                 ! variants, otherwise the PLX lexicon size explodes
!! SAS ; !viđajahkásaš
!+Use/NG: RHyph ; ! golmma-

!LEXICON SAS  * __@CODE@__ gives :»»» and goes to SASCont
!+Cmp#:»»# SASCont ;

!LEXICON NOM-COMPOUNDS != * __@CODE@__ logijahki, čuohtejahki
!+Cmp#:»»# NOM-COMPOUNDSCont ;


!LEXICON NOM-COMPOUNDSCont != * __@CODE@__ logijahki
!jahki+Sem/Time:jahºki ALBMI ; !logijahki
!proseanta+Sem/Part:proseanºta GOAHTI-A ;
!kilo+Sem/Measr:kilo GARGIA ;
!salla+Sem/Body_Measr:salla BEARRI ;

! Imprecise numbers
! -----------------

!LEXICON num-imprecise
